North Dakota, session 69, SB2042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 12-60-24 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
d. The North Dakota board of medicine for licenses or disciplinary investigations under
sectionsections 43-17-07.1 , 43 - 58 - 03.1, and 43 - 60 - 06.1 , except that criminal history
record checks need not be made unless required by the board.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 43-58-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The board may require an applicant for licensure or a licensee who is the subject of a
disciplinary investigation to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record
check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner
provided by section 12 - 60 - 24. All costs associated with the criminal history record check are
the responsibility of the licensee or applicant.
SECTION 3. Section 43-60-06.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
43-60-06.1. Criminal history record checks.
The board may require an applicant for licensure or a licensee who is the subject of a disciplinary
investigation to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide
criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12 - 60 - 24. All costs
associated with the criminal history record check are the responsibility of the licensee or applicant.

S. B. NO. 2042 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2042.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State